Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 24.55.300.
Administrative Procedure Act.

The administrative acts of the ombudsman are not subject to the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), except as provided in AS

24.55.090

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.310.
Conflict of interest. [Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 24.55.320.
Municipalities and school districts.

A municipality or school district may elect to become subject to the jurisdiction of the ombudsman appointed under this chapter.
If a municipality or school district so elects, it shall notify the ombudsman of that election and shall thereafter be considered an agency for the purposes of this chapter. If a municipality or school district subjects itself to the jurisdiction of the ombudsman, the municipality or school district shall pay its pro rata share of the cost of the operation of the office of the ombudsman based on the number of complaints or the case load emanating from that municipality or school district, as prescribed by the ombudsman.
If a municipality or school district elects to remove itself from the jurisdiction of the ombudsman, it shall notify the ombudsman of that election and shall not thereafter be considered an agency for the purposes of this chapter.
A municipality that elects to become subject to the jurisdiction of the ombudsman or to remove itself from that jurisdiction must do so by ordinance.
A school district that elects to become subject to the jurisdiction of the ombudsman or to remove itself from that jurisdiction must do so by resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 14 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Sec. 24.55.330.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“administrative act” means an action, omission, decision, recommendation, practice, policy, or procedure of an agency, but does not include the preparation or presentation of legislation or the substantive content of a judicial order, decision, or opinion;

“agency” includes a department, office, institution, corporation, authority, organization, commission, committee, council, or board of a municipality or in the executive, legislative, or judicial branches of the state government, and a department, office, institution, corporation, authority, organization, commission, committee, council, or board of a municipality or of the state government independent of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches; it also includes an officer, employee, or member of an “agency” acting or purporting to act in the exercise of official duties, but does not include the governor, the lieutenant governor, a member of the legislature, the victims’ advocate, the staff of the office of victims’ rights, a justice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of appeals, a superior court judge, a district court judge, a magistrate, a member of a city council or borough assembly, an elected city or borough mayor, or a member of an elected school board;

“record” means a document, paper, memorandum, book, letter, file, drawing, map, plat, photo, photographic file, motion picture, film, microfilm, microphotograph, exhibit, magnetic or paper tape, punched card, or other item developed or received under law or in connection with the transaction of official business, but does not include an attorney’s work product, material that is confidential as a privileged communication between an attorney and client under rules adopted by the supreme court, or confidential oil and gas geological and geophysical data.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 25 ch 12 SLA 1980; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 71 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2008)

Sec. 24.55.340.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as The Ombudsman Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)